South Dakota, session 2026, HB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. An excess tax levy approved by a school district pursuant to § 10-12-43 or 10-
12-43.1, prior to July 1, 2002, may not be imposed in 2026 or any year thereafter an amount
not exceeding:
(1) For taxes payable in 2027, one hundred percent of the original excess tax levy
amount approved by the district;
(2) For taxes payable in 2028, fifty percent of the original excess tax levy amount
approved by the district; and
(3) For taxes payable in 2029 and each year thereafter, zero percent of the original
excess tax levy amount approved by the district.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.